src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON GOAHTICnj       !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for speller reasons to hinder -goahttit, whick is confused with infinitive -goahtit
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
! Imprt+Pl2+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:Y1t ENDLEX ;       ! boahttit
! Imprt+Pl1:Y3t ENDLEX ;      ! boahttut     ! This renders boahttet that are wrong
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 NominalFormsV ;

LEXICON RAIMMAHALLACnj       !!≈ * **@CODE@**  restricted imperatives
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: Q6 ImprtSg2 ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
 +Imprt+Pl2+Use/NG+Dial/-GG:Y1t 12pflag ;       ! boahttit
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt+Du1:Y2 12pflag ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
! +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms

LEXICON CondV1
 +Prs:X6š CondBOAHTI ;         ! General -š- forms
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4l CondBOAHTI ;         ! !     -l- forms soappulin
 +Prs+Use/NG:X6l CondBOAHTI ;         !   ! -l- forms soppolin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6š CondBOAHTI ; ! goarošin (borašin) Vowel shortening
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4š CondBOAHTI ; !áiggušin (áiggošin, borašin) Stem vowel alternations
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6šivčče%> CondC ; !gorošivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6šivčče%> CondC ; ! goarošivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4šivčče%> CondC ; !áiggušivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6livčče%> CondC ; !gorolivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6livčče%> CondC ; ! goarolivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4livčče%> CondC ; !áiggulivččii

LEXICON CondBOAHTI
 PrtC1 ;
 PrtC2 ;
 +ConNeg:e K ;
 +ConNeg+Err/Orth:ij K ;

LEXICON ARVICnj
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:Q1 K ; ! Q1 because arvi is wrong
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^DISIMPj K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:Q6 K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3:X6šij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:X6lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:Q4lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:X6še K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:X6le K ;  ! ! X6 = i > á,
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:Q4le K ;  !   !Q4 i > á "Stem Vowel shift i:á"
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/-GG:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/-KJ:Q7ža K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ; !Prs
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:X2n K ;
 +V+IV:%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;	!álddagasti
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:X2n K ;
 +V+IV+Inf:t K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Nom:n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Gen:n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:me K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:min K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:men K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc:mis K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Com:mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»min K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»men K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»n R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»ma R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijnna K ;
 +V+IV:X4 NominalFormsV8 ;
 +V+IV:Q6 NominalFormsV8 ;
 +V+IV:X6 NominalFormsV9 ;
 +V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
! Directly to this INCH, and not via the same path as the others, as arvi- does
! not get passive (& not deverbal nouns?). As a safety first -option, I do not add
! more than this one line now.




!! ## Basic lexica for contracted verbs
!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
!   -------------------------


LEXICON GILLE_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;


LEXICON DOHPPE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ; !Sup




!! ###  BAsic lexica for Contracted verbs
!!! 2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!   2a. Impersonals
!   2b. already derived words
!   2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   2d. other special lexicas
!   ----------------------------------------------





! 2a. Impersonals
!   ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON BORGE_IV !Contracted Impersonal Verbs
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> ContrImpersonal ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
! +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;  !replaced
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBORGE ;
! +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
! Here I have exchanged Pekkaºs original BORGE with DOHPPE. DeverbalVerbsBORGE
! was not defined, and since they are deverbal verbs, intransitive impersonal
! BORGE should behave like intransitive personal DOHPPE. TT 020108.
!LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE now up and going. TO 020106




!   2b. already derived words
!   -------------------------


LEXICON CIRRO_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON MUITA_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> CIRROStemTV ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON BASSO_IV ! Bisyllabic, inherently passive -ot verbs
 +V+IV: OT-PASSIVE-BASSO ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N:»m PRE_BOAHTALADDAN ;



! 2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   ----------------------------------------------

LEXICON COHKKA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive - no stit-deverbal
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsCOHKKA ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON GARRE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  garret, loget. with Personal Passive. for speller to hinder garrenávnnas, garrenoaivi etc
 +V+TV:%> GARREStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON ORRO_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  orrot. for speller to hinder orronsadji etc
 +V+IV:%> ORROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;



!   2d. other special lexicas
!   -------------------------

LEXICON MAHTA_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;
! This lexicon goes as GILLE except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that máhttát takes acc objects, but does not have passive.




! Substems for contracted verbs
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON BASSO-MUITAL
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON DOHPPEStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsDOHPPE- ;

LEXICON GARREStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsGARRE- ;


LEXICON CIRROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRRO- ;
