src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VGenVerbs
čohkkát:čohkká COHKKA_IV ;
čohkkát+Err/Orth:čohká COHKKA_IV ;
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
gohččot:gohččo BASSO_IV ;
bođđet:bođđe DOHPPE_TV ;
gohččojuvvot:gohččojuvvo BASSO_IV ;
busket:buske GILLE_IV ;
báhkket:báhkke GARRE_TV ;
curbmát:curbmá CIRRO_IV ;
dahkat+V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+Err/Orth:dahko BASSO_IV ;
doddjot:doddjo BASSO_IV ;
dovdát:dovdá MUITA_TV ;
dáhpet:dáhpe DOHPPE_TV ;
firrot+v2:virro BASSO_IV ;
garret:garre GARRE_TV ;
gildot:gildo BASSO_IV ;
girjet:girje GILLE_IV ;
goadnát:goadná CIRRO_IV ;
gohččut+Err/Orth:gohččo MUITA_TV ;
gollet:golle DOHPPE_TV ;
gullát:gullá MUITA_TV ;
haksot:hakso BASSO_IV ;
hirrát:hirrá CIRRO_IV ;
internašunaliseret+OLang/NOB:internašunalisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
jovgot:jovgo BASSO_IV ;
konstateret+OLang/NOB:konstatere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
lahttet:lahtte DOHPPE_TV ;
loget:loge GARRE_TV ;
láhppot+Err/Orth-a-á:lahppo BASSO_IV ;
mannet:manne GILLE_IV ;
mollet:molle DOHPPE_TV ;
muitát:mujtá MUITA_TV ;
máhttát:máhttá MAHTA_TV ;
njaŋgát:njaŋgá CIRRO_IV ;
njuiket:njujke GILLE_IV ;
orrot:orro ORRO_IV ;
postet:poste DOHPPE_TV ;
respekteret+OLang/NOB:re^spektere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
ruddet:rudde GILLE_IV ;
ráfot:ráfo  BASSO_IV ;
siviliseret+OLang/NOB:sivilisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
skeittát:skejttá CIRRO_IV ;
stándet:stánde GILLE_IV ;
subsidieret+OLang/NOB:subsidi^ere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
veddot:veddo BASSO_IV ;
vuordát:vuordá MUITA_TV ;
vuostálastit+Err/Orth:vuostálaste MUITA_TV ;
vávvát:vávvá CIRRO_IV ;
áššáskuhttot:áššáskuhtto BASSO_IV ;
čuollát:čuollá CIRRO_IV ;
sisačálihuvvot:sisa#čálihuvvo BASSO_IV ;
báitot:báito BASSO_IV ;
denet:dene GILLE_IV ;
gaifát:gajfá MUITA_TV ;
naffát:naffá CIRRO_IV ;
reitot:rejto BASSO_IV ;
skálbmet:skálbme DOHPPE_TV ;
moraliseret+OLang/NOB:moralisere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
eretjohttát:eret#johttá CIRRO_IV ;
avluset+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:avluse GILLE_IV ; !LIA
bløgget+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:bløgge DOHPPE_TV ; !LIA
nyhttet+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:nyhtte GILLE_IV ; !LIA
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
ahccát:ahccá CIRRO_IV ;
ahttot:ahtto BASSO_IV ;
akkvireret+OLang/NOB:ak^kvirere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
apokoperet+OLang/NOB:apokopere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
arvát:arvá BORGE_IV ;
balvet:balve BORGE_IV ;
bivdot:bivdo BASSO_IV ;
boggát:boggá CIRRO_IV ;
borget:borge BORGE_IV ;
bullát:bullá CIRRO_IV ;
dateret+OLang/NOB:datere DOHPPE_TV ;
davrát:davrá CIRRO_IV ;
degenereret+OLang/NOB:degenerere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
doteret+OLang/NOB:dotere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
dumpet:dumpe GILLE_IV ;
experimenteret+OLang/SWE:experimentere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
fadnot:fadno BASSO_IV ;
fagŋát:fagŋá CIRRO_IV ;
fasetteret+OLang/NOB:fasettere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
firtet+v1:firte BORGE_IV ;
firtet+v2:virte BORGE_IV ;
fluktueret+OLang/NOB:fluktu^ere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
giŋgot:giŋgo GILLE_IV ;
goavrát:goavrá CIRRO_IV ;
golgot:golgo BASSO_IV ;
golket:golke BORGE_IV ;
gymnastiseret+OLang/NOB:gymnastisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
himmát:himmá GILLE_IV ;
hálsát:hálsá CIRRO_IV ;
jallet:jalle BORGE_IV ;
jávvot:jávvo BASSO_IV ;
karteret+OLang/NOB:kartere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
konvoluteret+OLang/SWE:konvolutere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
lihppet:lihppe DOHPPE_TV ;
loaggát:loaggá CIRRO_IV ;
misset:misse GILLE_IV ;
muohttát:muohttá BORGE_IV ;
njallet:njalle BORGE_IV ;
njeakcát:njeakcá CIRRO_IV ;
njurdot:njurdo BASSO_IV ;
obbet:obbe DOHPPE_TV ;
opteret+OLang/NOB:optere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
ođđot:ođđo BASSO_IV ;
professionaliseret+OLang/SWE:professionalisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
reavrát:reavrá CIRRO_IV ;
resigneret+OLang/NOB:resignere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
romfet:romfe DOHPPE_TV ;
ruodnát:ruodná CIRRO_IV ;
savvot:savvo BASSO_IV ;
sirkuleret+OLang/NOB:sirkulere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
skuolfát:skuolfá CIRRO_IV ;
sollisiteret+OLang/NOB:sollisitere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
stoalpát:stoalpá CIRRO_IV ;
tenderet+OLang/NOB:tendere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
trancheret+OLang/SWE:tranchere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
virtet:virte BORGE_IV ;
váfot:váfo BASSO_IV ;
váhččet:váhčče BORGE_IV ;
áidnet:ájdne BORGE_IV ;
šealgát:šealgá CIRRO_IV ;
šerret:šerre BORGE_IV ;
šlahttet:šlahtte BORGE_IV ;
šlahttát:šlahttá BORGE_IV ;
šlubbet:šlubbe DOHPPE_TV ;
čovdot:čovdo BASSO_IV ;
čuiket:čujke BORGE_IV ;
čuorgát:čuorgá CIRRO_IV ;
čánset:čánse GILLE_IV ;
